Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 32
PFAS in Drinking Water, Groundwater, and Surface Waters

46-32-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “PFAS in Drinking Water, Groundwater, and Surface Waters Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 144, § 2, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 169, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

46-32-2.
Interim drinking water standard and testing requirements.

As used in this chapter, “PFAS contaminants” means perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA), perfluorooctane sulfonic acid (PFOS), perfluorohexane sulfonic acid (PFHxS), perfluorononanoic acid (PFNA), and perfluoroheptanoic acid (PFHpA), and perfluorodecanoic acid (PFDA).

On or before July 1, 2023, all public water supply systems in the state as defined by §

46-13-2

, except transient, non-community water systems as defined by the department of health in

216-RICR-50-05-1

as may be amended, shall conduct monitoring for the presence of PFAS contaminants in drinking water supplied by the system. Regular monitoring shall be conducted as follows until adoption of maximum contaminant level rules pursuant to §

46-32-4

:

If monitoring results detect the presence of any PFAS contaminants individually or in combination in excess of the interim drinking water standard level of twenty parts per trillion (20 ppt), the public water supply system shall conduct continued quarterly monitoring.

If monitoring results detect the presence of any PFAS contaminants individually or in combination at a level equal to or below the interim drinking water standard level of twenty parts per trillion (20 ppt), the public water supply system shall conduct continued monitoring annually.

If monitoring results do not detect the presence of any PFAS contaminants, the public water supply system shall conduct continued monitoring every two (2) years.

If monitoring results under subsection (b) of this section confirm the presence of any PFAS contaminants individually or in combination in excess of the interim drinking water standard level of twenty parts per trillion (20 ppt), the department of health shall require monitoring in a manner consistent with applicable regulations governing synthetic organic contaminants, including but not limited to, requiring a confirmation sample, prior to directing the public water supply system to implement treatment or other remedy to reduce the levels of PFAS contaminants in the drinking water of the public water supply system below the interim drinking water standard level.

On or before July 1, 2023, if the PFAS contaminants exceed the level of twenty parts per trillion (20 ppt), the public water supply system shall provide potable water through other means to all customers or users of the system. The requirement for a public water supply system to provide potable water to customers and users of the system through other means shall cease when monitoring results indicate that the levels of PFAS contaminants in the drinking water of the public water supply system are below the interim drinking water standard level of twenty parts per trillion (20 ppt).

The director of the department of health is authorized to enforce the requirements of this chapter in accordance with the provisions of chapter 13 of this title and violations will be subject to the penalties imposed pursuant to §

46-13-16

. A person may contest or appeal a decision of the director, a penalty imposed for violation, or the fact of violation pursuant to the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42 (the “administrative procedures act”).

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 144, § 2, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 169, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

46-32-3.
Drinking water standards for PFAS contaminants.

If the director of the department of health decides to publish a notice pursuant to the provisions of §

46-32-4(b)(1)

then on or before June 1, 2024, the director of the department of health shall, pursuant to this section, file under §

42-35-4

a final rule with the secretary of state regarding adoption of the interim drinking water standard level of twenty parts per trillion (20 ppt) for perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA), perfluorooctane sulfonic acid (PFOS), perfluorohexane sulfonic acid (PFHxS), perfluorononanoic acid (PFNA), perfluoroheptanoic acid (PFHpA), and perfluorodecanoic acid (PFDA) as a maximum contaminant level (MCL). Upon the effective date of the final rule, the drinking water monitoring provisions of §

46-32-2

may be suspended, modified, or superseded by the provisions of the final rules.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 144, § 2, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 169, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

46-32-4.
Standard for per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances as a class or subclass.

If the director of the department of health decides to publish a notice pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b)(1) of this section then on or before February 1, 2024, the director of the department of health shall initiate a public notice and comment process by publishing a copy of the final rules and an advance notice of proposed rulemaking pursuant to §

42-35-2.5

regarding the regulation under the rules and regulations pertaining to public drinking water of per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) as a class or subclasses.

On or before September 1, 2024, the director of the department of health shall either:

Publish a notice of proposed rulemaking regarding the regulation of PFAS compounds under the rules and regulations pertaining to public drinking water as a class or subclasses; or

Publish a notice of decision not to regulate PFAS compounds as a class or subclasses under the rules and regulations pertaining to public drinking water that includes, at a minimum, an identification of all legal, technical, or other impediments to regulating PFAS compounds as a class or subclasses and a detailed response to all public comments received.

If the director of the department of health proposes a rule pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the director of the department of health shall file under §

42-35-4

a final rule with the secretary of state regarding the regulation of PFAS compounds as a class or subclasses under the rules and regulations pertaining to public drinking water on or before June 30, 2025.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 144, § 2, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 169, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

46-32-5.
Groundwater quality standards for per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances.

On or before December 31, 2023, the director or the department of environmental management shall file under §

42-35-4

a final rule with the secretary of state to adopt groundwater quality standards for, at a minimum, perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA), perfluorooctane sulfonic acid (PFOS), perfluorohexane sulfonic acid (PFHxS), perfluorononanoic acid (PFNA), perfluoroheptanoic acid (PFHpA), and perfluorodecanoic acid (PFDA) consistent with authority provided by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 144, § 2, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 169, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

46-32-6.
Surface water quality action levels for per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances.

On or before December 31, 2023, the director of the department of environmental management shall file under §

42-35-4

a final rule with the secretary of state to adopt surface water quality action levels to address the contamination of Rhode Island waters from releases of, at a minimum, perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA), perfluorooctane sulfonic acid (PFOS), perfluorohexane sulfonic acid (PFHxS), perfluorononanoic acid (PFNA), perfluoroheptanoic acid (PFHpA), and perfluorodecanoic acid (PFDA).

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 144, § 2, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 169, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

46-32-7.
Investigation of potential sources of per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances contamination.

On or before November 1, 2023, the director of the department of environmental management shall publish a plan for public review and comment to complete a statewide investigation of potential sources of per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) contamination. As part of this investigation, the director of the department of health shall conduct a pilot project at public water systems by an applicable analytical method to evaluate total PFAS. The director of the department of environmental management shall initiate implementation of the plan not later than January 1, 2024.

On or before June 1, 2024, all public water systems shall conduct monitoring for the maximum number of PFAS detectable from standard laboratory methods.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 144, § 2, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 169, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

46-32-8.
Landfill monitoring.

On or before December 31, 2022, the director of the department of environmental management shall file under §

42-35-4

a final rule with the secretary of state to adopt standards and procedures for groundwater and leachate monitoring at and around landfills including, at a minimum, perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA), perfluorooctane sulfonic acid (PFOS), perfluorohexane sulfonic acid (PFHxS), perfluorononanoic acid (PFNA), perfluoroheptanoic acid (PFHpA), and perfluorodecanoic acid (PFDA).

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 144, § 2, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 169, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.